Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
PARTIES, GENERAL PROVISIONS

[§634-1] Assignee; nonnegotiable chose.
The assignee of any nonnegotiable chose in action, assigned in writing, may
maintain thereon in the assignee's own name any action which, but for the
assignment, might be maintained by the assignor; subject, however, to all
equities and setoffs existing in favor of the party liable against the assignor
and which existed at the time of the assignment or at any time thereafter until
notice thereof was given to the party liable, except as otherwise provided. [L
1898, c 7, §1; RL 1925, §2361; RL 1935, §4045; RL 1945, §10037; RL 1955,
§230-7; HRS §634-31; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(a); ren HRS §634-1; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Real party in interest, see HRCP rule 17(a); DCRCP rule 17(a).
Setoff, see HRCP rule 13; DCRCP rule 13.

Case Notes

Cases prior to adoption of the Hawaii Rules of Civil
Procedure.

Requiring joinder as coplaintiff on breach of contract. 5 H.
430 (1885).

Set off against assignee. 11 H. 764 (1899).

Assignee of judgment may sue in own name. 20 H. 138 (1910),
aff'd 226 U.S. 462 (1913).

Endorsee for collection may sue in own name. 29 H. 434
(1926).

May sue in assignor's or assignee's name, under common law
rule. 30 H. 959 (1929).

Principal and agent. 31 H. 12 (1929).

Legality of assignment. 34 H. 754 (1947).

Cited: 20 H. 146, 149 (1910); 27 H. 642, 645 (1923); 36 H.
676, 680 (1944).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next